trunk/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.sv.dix
<pardef n="försäkr/an__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> 
  <e a="is">       <p><l>an</l>        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>       <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingar</l>        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingarna</l>       <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="politiker__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> 
  <e a="is">       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bull/er__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> 
  <e a="is">       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ret</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="böter__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~er / ~ern / ~rar / ~rarna -->
  <e a="is">       <p><l></l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="anhörig__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~n / ~na -->
  <e a="is">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="spelrum__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~met / ~ / ~men -->
  <e a="is">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>met</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bekym/mer__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Common; ~er / ~ret / ~er / ~ren; invariant in indefinite -->
  <e a="is">       <p><l>mer</l>        <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mret</l>       <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>        <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mren</l>       <r>mer<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bane__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~n / ~r / ~rna -->
  <e a="is">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="förf/ader__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl">
  <e a="is">       <p><l>ader</l>        <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adern</l>      <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äder</l>      <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äderna</l>    <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="m/or__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl">
  <e a="is">       <p><l>or</l>         <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odern</l>      <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ödrar</l>      <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ödrarna</l>    <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="studerande__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sp"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~n / ~ / ~na; invariant in singular/plural indefinite -->
  <e a="is">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bokträ__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl">
  <e a="is">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>


<!-- Added from the pair is-sv END -->

    <!-- Proper nouns -->

<pardef n="Schweiz__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Eva__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Jonas__np">
  <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Trond__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Magnusson__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Afrika__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Paris__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Wikipedia__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Added from the pair is-sv START -->

	<pardef n="Finnbogadottir__np">
	  <e a="is">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
	  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="Bjarnas/on__np">
	  <e a="is">       <p><l></l>          <r>on<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
	  <e>       <p><l>öner</l>          <r>on<s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
	</pardef>
 
	<pardef n="Abbas__np">
	  <e a="is">       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
	  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="Putin__np">
	  <e a="is">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
	</pardef>
	

<e lm="försäkran" a="is"><i>försäkr</i><par n="försäkr/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="uppmuntran" a="is"><i>uppmuntr</i><par n="försäkr/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="buller" a="is">   <i>bull</i><par n="bull/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="palestinier" a="is"><i>palestinier</i><par n="politiker__n"/></e>
<e lm="samarbetspartner" a="is"><i>samarbetspartner</i><par n="politiker__n"/></e>
<e lm="anställd" a="is"> <i>anställd</i><par n="anhörig__n"/></e>
<e lm="spelrum" a="is">  <i>spelrum</i><par n="spelrum__n"/></e>
<e lm="sakkunnig" a="is"><i>sakkunnig</i><par n="anhörig__n"/></e>
<e lm="tekniker" a="is"> <i>tekniker</i><par n="politiker__n"/></e>
<e lm="bekymmer" a="is"> <i>bekym</i><par n="bekym/mer__n"/></e>
<e lm="anhörig" a="is">  <i>anhörig</i><par n="anhörig__n"/></e>
<e lm="parlamentariker" a="is"><i>parlamentariker</i><par n="politiker__n"/></e>
<e lm="bane" a="is">     <i>bane</i><par n="bane__n"/></e>
<e lm="bekvämligheter" a="is"><i>bekvämligheter</i><par n="böter__n"/></e>
<e lm="bio" a="is">      <i>bio</i><par n="bane__n"/></e>
<e lm="exportintäkter" a="is"><i>exportintäkter</i><par n="böter__n"/></e>
<e lm="förfader" a="is"> <i>förf</i><par n="förf/ader__n"/></e>
<e lm="husmor" a="is">   <i>husm</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="mormor" a="is">   <i>morm</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="nyheter" a="is">  <i>nyheter</i><par n="böter__n"/></e>
<e lm="stadsfullmäktig" a="is"><i>stadsfullmäktig</i><par n="anhörig__n"/></e>
<e lm="studerande" a="is"><i>studerande</i><par n="studerande__n"/></e>
<e lm="utsikter" a="is"> <i>utsikter</i><par n="böter__n"/></e>
<e lm="bokträ" a="is">   <i>bokträ</i><par n="bokträ__n"/></e>
<e lm="jordvärme" a="is"><i>jordvärme</i><par n="bokträ__n"/></e>
<e lm="trä" a="is">      <i>trä</i><par n="bokträ__n"/></e>
<e lm="mormorsmor" a="SALDO">          <i>mormorsm</i><par n="m/or__n"/></e>
<e lm="Barbados">        <i>Barbados</i><par n="Paris__np"/></e>
<e lm="Island">          <i>Island</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mauritius">       <i>Mauritius</i><par n="Paris__np"/></e>
<e lm="Östtimor">        <i>Östtimor</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
<e lm="Svensson">        <i>Svensson</i><par n="Magnusson__np"/></e>
<e lm="Världsbanken" a="is"><i>Världsbanken</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Davies" a="is">   <i>Davies</i><par n="Abbas__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hughes" a="is">   <i>Hughes</i><par n="Abbas__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mccarthy" a="is"> <i>Mccarthy</i><par n="Magnusson__np"/></e>
<e lm="Morgan" a="is">   <i>Morgan</i><par n="Trond__np"/></e>
<e lm="Putin" a="is">    <i>Putin</i><par n="Putin__np"/></e>
<e lm="Stabilitetspakten" a="is"><i>Stabilitetspakten</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Trakatellis" a="is"><i>Trakatellis</i><par n="Abbas__np"/></e>
<e lm="Transnistrien" a="is"><i>Transnistrien</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
<e lm="Darwin" a="is">   <i>Darwin</i><par n="Magnusson__np"/></e>
<e lm="Finnbogadottir" a="is"><i>Finnbogadottir</i><par n="Finnbogadottir__np"/></e>
<e lm="Halldorsson" a="is"><i>Halldorss</i><par n="Bjarnas/on__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jonsdottir" a="is"><i>Jonsdottir</i><par n="Finnbogadottir__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kerrison" a="is"> <i>Kerris</i><par n="Bjarnas/on__np"/></e>
<e lm="Isolfsson" a="is"><i>Isolfss</i><par n="Bjarnas/on__np"/></e>
<e lm="Akranes" a="is">  <i>Akranes</i><par n="Schweiz__np"/></e>
<e lm="Borgarnes" a="is"><i>Borgarnes</i><par n="Schweiz__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dora" a="is">     <i>Dora</i><par n="Eva__np"/></e>
<e lm="Djingis" a="is">  <i>Djingis</i><par n="Jonas__np"/></e>
<e lm="Harri" a="is">    <i>Harri</i><par n="Trond__np"/></e>
<e lm="Húsanes" a="is">  <i>Húsanes</i><par n="Schweiz__np"/></e>
<e lm="Keflavik flygplats" a="is"><i>Keflavik<b/>flygplats</i><par n="Paris__np"/></e>
<e lm="Magnus" a="is">   <i>Magnus</i><par n="Jonas__np"/></e>
<e lm="Margaret" a="is"> <i>Margaret</i><par n="Eva__np"/></e>
<e lm="Vidförli" a="is"> <i>Vidförli</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
<e lm="Alfrun" a="is">   <i>Alfrun</i><par n="Eva__np"/></e>
<e lm="Asgeir" a="is">   <i>Asgeir</i><par n="Trond__np"/></e>
<e lm="Odysseus" a="is"> <i>Odysseus</i><par n="Jonas__np"/></e>
